apertium-br-fr/apertium-br-fr.br.dix
    <pardef n="stl/epel__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>epel</l>
          <r>epel<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>	  
      <e>	  
        <p>
          <l>apet</l>
          <r>epel<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>apan</l>
          <r>epel<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>apez</l>
          <r>epel<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ap</l>
          <r>epel<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>apomp</l>
          <r>epel<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>apit</l>
          <r>epel<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>apont</l>
          <r>epel<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aper</l>
          <r>epel<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="impers"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>apen</l>
          <r>epel<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>apes</l>
          <r>epel<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ape</l>
          <r>epel<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>apemp</l>
          <r>epel<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>apec’h</l>
          <r>epel<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>apent</l>
          <r>epel<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aped</l>
          <r>epel<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="impers"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>apis</l>
          <r>epel<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>apjout</l>
          <r>epel<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>apas</l>
          <r>epel<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>apjomp</l>
          <r>epel<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>apjoc’h</l>
          <r>epel<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>apjont</l>
          <r>epel<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>apjod</l>
          <r>epel<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="impers"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>apin</l>
          <r>epel<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>api</l>
          <r>epel<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>apo</l>
          <r>epel<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>apimp</l>
          <r>epel<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>apot</l>
          <r>epel<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>apint</l>
          <r>epel<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>apor</l>
          <r>epel<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="impers"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>apfen</l>
          <r>epel<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>apfes</l>
          <r>epel<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>apfe</l>
          <r>epel<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>apfemp</l>
          <r>epel<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>apfec’h</l>
          <r>epel<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>apfent</l>
          <r>epel<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>apfed</l>
          <r>epel<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="impers"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>apjen</l>
          <r>epel<s n="vblex"/><s n="cip"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>apjes</l>
          <r>epel<s n="vblex"/><s n="cip"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>apje</l>
          <r>epel<s n="vblex"/><s n="cip"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>apjemp</l>
          <r>epel<s n="vblex"/><s n="cip"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>apjec’h</l>
          <r>epel<s n="vblex"/><s n="cip"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>apjent</l>
          <r>epel<s n="vblex"/><s n="cip"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>apjed</l>
          <r>epel<s n="vblex"/><s n="cip"/><s n="impers"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ap</l>
          <r>epel<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>apomp</l>
          <r>epel<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>apit</l>
          <r>epel<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>apent</l>
          <r>epel<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

	
	
	
<!-- END PARADIGMS TO CHECK -->


  </pardefs>

     <e lm="stlepel"><i>stl</i><par n="stl/epel__vblex"/></e>
